dev/example.dix
<dictionary>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
  </sdefs>
<pardefs>
  <pardef n="common_singular">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ur</l>
        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="hest/ur__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ar</l>
        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r/>
      </p>
      <par n="common_singular"/>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="gest/ur__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ir</l>
        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r/>
      </p>
      <par n="common_singular"/>
    </e>
  </pardef>

</pardefs>
<section id="main" type="standard">
  <e lm="gestur"><i>gest</i><par n="gest/ur__n"/></e>
  <e lm="hestur"><i>hest</i><par n="hest/ur__n"/></e>
</section>
</dictionary>
